Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB204.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1114-A(b)(1) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 1114-A. Returns.--* * *(b) (1) All proceedings at the central tabulation center shall be under the direction of the county board of elections or of such persons as it may designate and shall be conducted under the observation of the public insofar as is practical, but no persons except those authorized for the purpose shall touch any 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 ballot or district totals card. All persons who are engaged in processing and counting the ballots and district totals cards shall be deputized and take an oath that they will faithfully perform their assigned duties. Compensation and other payments received by an individual hired for the sole purpose of performing duties under this paragraph shall not be deemed income classified and categorized under section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971."* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0204PN0152 - 2 - 1234567891011